Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 15.
Virginia Code Commission.

Sec.

30-154.1. Publication of Virginia compacts.

§ 30-154.1. Publication of Virginia compacts.

The Code Commission shall annually arrange for the codification and incorporation into the Code of Virginia of all general, special and limited compacts to which the Commonwealth is a party. Within the discretion of the Commission, such incorporation may be through insertion within the existing text and organization of the Code of Virginia or as a freestanding volume.

The Commission shall, on or before July 1 of each year, transmit to the Secretary of the Commonwealth a copy of each new, amended or repealed compact as it was adopted by the Commonwealth in accordance with §

2.2-403

.

(2001, c. 100, § 9-77.11:03.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2001, c. 100 enacted former

§

9-77.11:03, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to

§

30-152, Acts 2001, c. 100 has been given effect in this section as set out above.